Illinois, session 104th, HB5477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 9commercial solar energy facilities. 10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 12solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 13Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 14mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 15at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 16event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 17subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 18Act. 19    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 20conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 21total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 22facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 23an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or   HB5477- 2 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 2Public Act 102-1123).3    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 4ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 6whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 7rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 8construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 9time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 10a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 11permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 12operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 13will own or operate the facility.14    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 15not a participating property.16    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 17located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 18occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 19develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 20solar energy facility is filed with the county.21    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 22following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 23that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 24wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 25is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 26facility, public library, or community center.  HB5477- 3 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    "Participating property" means real property that is the 2subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 3the owner of the real property that provides the facility 4owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 5property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 6energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 7supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 8real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 9of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 10commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.11    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 12located on participating property and that is existing and 13occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 14develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 15solar energy facility is filed with the county.16    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 17        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 18    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 19    or 20        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 21    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 22    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 23    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 24substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 25containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 26storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility   HB5477- 4 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1or commercial solar energy facility.2    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 3blades. 4    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 5the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 6zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 7for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 8facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 9requirements specified in this Section but may not include 10requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 11commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 12than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 13siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 14that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 15in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 16outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 17outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 18jurisdiction of a municipality. 19    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 20subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 21special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 22commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 23approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 24county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 25of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 26hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance   HB5477- 5 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 2days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 3county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 4an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 5witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 6restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 7limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 8cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 9public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 10Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 11permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 12conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 13be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 14county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 15impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 16prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 17wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 18granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 19of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 20mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 21to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 22Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 23systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 24board.25    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 26with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in   HB5477- 6 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 22023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).3    (e) A county may require: 4        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 5    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 6    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  7Setback Description           Setback Distance 8Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip9Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the10                              nearest point on the outside11                              wall of the structure 12Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip13                              height of the wind tower to the14                              nearest point on the outside15                              wall of the structure 16Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip17                              height of the wind tower to the18                              nearest point on the outside19                              wall of the structure 20Boundary Lines of             None21Participating Property    HB5477- 7 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip2Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the property4                              line of the nonparticipating5                              property 6Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip7                              height of the wind tower8                              to the center point of the9                              public road right-of-way 10Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip11Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the12and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property13(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 14Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 15Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line16Outbuildings) 17Overhead Utility Service      None18Lines to Individual19Houses or Outbuildings 20Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade21and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower  HB5477- 8 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the2Protected Lands               property line of the fish and3                              wildlife area or protected4                              land5    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 6    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 7    National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety 8    Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the Federal 9    Energy Regulatory Commission and their designees or 10    successors; 11        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 12    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 13    indicates that any occupied community building or 14    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 15    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 16    operating conditions;17        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 18    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 19    edge of any component of the facility:  20Setback Description           Setback Distance 21Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest22Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 23Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure   HB5477- 9 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Boundary Lines of             None2Participating Property     3Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest4                              edge 5Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest6Nonparticipating Property     point on the property7                              line of the nonparticipating8                              property 9        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 10    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 11    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 12    feet; and 13        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 14    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 15    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 16    arrays are at full tilt. 17    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 18waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 19affected nonparticipating property.20    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 21in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 22commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 23than the sound limitations established by the Illinois   HB5477- 10 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 2901, and 910.3    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 4installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 6that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 7siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 8development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 9solar energy facilities. 10    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 11commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 12facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 13permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 14the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 15ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 16conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 17regulations . 18    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 19disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 20facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 21developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 22agricultural or industrial uses. 23    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 24commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 25facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 26by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the   HB5477- 11 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1county with similar capital value and cost. 2    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 3shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 4or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 5commercial solar energy facility or related financial 6assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 7the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 8agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 9standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 10version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 112022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 12accordance with the financial assurance required by those 13agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 14    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 15solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 16the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 17surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 18during and following construction or deconstruction of the 19facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 20facility developer and shall include the location of any 21potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 22extent this information is publicly available from the county 23or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 24drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 25procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 26agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility   HB5477- 12 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 2procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 3affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 4and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 5practicable. 6    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 7wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 8property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 9to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 10    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 11surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 12solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 13similar structures. 14    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 15towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 16blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 17height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 18Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 19Part 77.20    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 21facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 22provide:23        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 24    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 25    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 26    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and  HB5477- 13 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 2    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 3    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 4    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 5    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 6    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 7    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 8    review. 9    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 10or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 11recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 12Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 13Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 14    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:15        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 16    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 17    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or18        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 19    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 20    protected lands, including areas identified by the 21    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.22    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 23evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 24Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 25State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 26Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act.   HB5477- 14 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 2limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 3at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 4health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 5songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 6commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 7and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 8cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 9Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 10management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 11impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 12and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 13if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 14comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 15the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 16constructed. 17    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 18effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 19Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 20vegetation management plans that may be required under this 21subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 22guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 23property management practices that provide and maintain native 24and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 25the health and well-being of pollinators. 26    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement   HB5477- 15 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 2district, or other unit of local government relating to a 3commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 4facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 5owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 6improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 7commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 8facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 9by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 10wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 11so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 12driving public after the completion of the facility's 13construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 14the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 15commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 16restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 17the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 18a result of construction-related activities.19    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 20owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 21specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 22the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 23energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 24charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 25a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 26use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably   HB5477- 16 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1related to the cost of administration of the road use 2agreement. 3    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 4for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 5damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 6the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 7energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 8commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 9the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 10caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 11facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 12with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 13for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 14owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 15or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 16caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 17wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 18as soon as reasonably practicable. 19    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 20owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 21commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 22facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 23including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 24ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 25the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 26Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the   HB5477- 17 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 2plan required by subsection (j-5). 3    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 4102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 5approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 6energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 7application was submitted to a unit of local government before 8January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 9(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 10energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 11agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 12Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 13Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 14commercial solar energy development on property that is 15located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 16Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 17appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 18and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 19Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 20(Source: P.A. 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 21104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)23    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 24commercial solar energy facilities. 25    (a) As used in this Section:  HB5477- 18 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    "Commercial operation date" means the calendar date the 2facility owner notifies the landowner, county, and Department 3of Agriculture, in writing, that commercial operation of a 4commercial solar energy facility or commercial wind energy 5facility has commenced. 6    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 7solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 8Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 9mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 10at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 11event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 12subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 13Act. 14    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 15conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 16total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 17facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 18an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 19municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 20Public Act 102-1123).21    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 22ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 23commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 24whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 25rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 26construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the   HB5477- 19 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 2a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 3permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 4operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 5will own or operate the facility.6    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 7not a participating property.8    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 9located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 10occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 11develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 12solar energy facility is filed with the county.13    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 14following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 15that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 16wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 17is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 18facility, public library, or community center.19    "Participating property" means real property that is the 20subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 21the owner of the real property that provides the facility 22owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 23property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 24energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 25supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 26real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose   HB5477- 20 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 2commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.3    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 4located on participating property and that is existing and 5occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 6develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 7solar energy facility is filed with the county.8    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 9        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 10    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 11    or 12        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 13    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 14    Natural Areas Preservation Act.15    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 16substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 17containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 18storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 19or commercial solar energy facility. "Supporting facilities" 20includes energy storage systems capable of absorbing energy 21and storing it for use at a later time, including, but not 22limited to, batteries and other electrochemical and 23electromechanical technologies or systems. 24    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 25blades. 26    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether   HB5477- 21 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 2zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 3for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 4facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 5requirements specified in this Section but may not include 6requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 7commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 8than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 9siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 10that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 11in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 12outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 13outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 14jurisdiction of a municipality. A county may also regulate the 15siting of commercial solar energy facilities with standards 16that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 17in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 18outside of the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality. 19    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 20subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 21special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 22commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 23approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 24county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 25of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 26hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance   HB5477- 22 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1with the Open Meetings Act and shall conclude not more than 60 2days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 3county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 4an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 5witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 6restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 7limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 8cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 9public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 10Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 11permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 12conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 13be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 14county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 15impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 16prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 17wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 18granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 19of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 20mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 21to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 22Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 23systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 24board.25    (c-5) A commercial wind energy facility or commercial 26solar energy facility proposed to be located on property in an   HB5477- 23 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1unincorporated area of the county within the zoning 2jurisdiction of a municipality, and located adjacent to the 3corporate boundary of a municipality shall either be annexed 4to the municipality subject to the requirements under Section 57-1-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code or be subject to the 6municipality's zoning regulations. 7    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 8with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 9compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 102023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).11    (e) A county may require: 12        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 13    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 14    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  15Setback Description           Setback Distance 16Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip17Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the18                              nearest point on the outside19                              wall of the structure 20Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip21                              height of the wind tower to the22                              nearest point on the outside23                              wall of the structure   HB5477- 24 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip2                              height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the outside4                              wall of the structure 5Boundary Lines of             None6Participating Property  7Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip8Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the9                              nearest point on the property10                              line of the nonparticipating11                              property 12Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip13                              height of the wind tower14                              to the center point of the15                              public road right-of-way 16Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip17Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the18and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property19(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 20Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 21Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line  HB5477- 25 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Outbuildings) 2Overhead Utility Service      None3Lines to Individual4Houses or Outbuildings 5Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade6and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower7Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the8Protected Lands               property line of the fish and9                              wildlife area or protected10                              land11    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 12    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 13    National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety 14    Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the Federal 15    Energy Regulatory Commission and their designees or 16    successors; 17        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 18    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 19    indicates that any occupied community building or 20    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 21    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 22    operating conditions;23        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 24    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest   HB5477- 26 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    edge of any above-ground component of the facility, 2    excluding fencing:  3Setback Description           Setback Distance 4Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest5Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 6Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 7Boundary Lines of             None8Participating Property     9Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest10                              edge of the public 11                              right-of-way  12Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest13Nonparticipating Property     point on the property14                              line of the nonparticipating15                              property 16        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 17    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 18    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 19    feet; and 20        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so   HB5477- 27 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 2    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 3    arrays are at full tilt.4    This subsection (e) shall not preclude the ability of a 5county to require a reasonable setback distance between 6fencing and public rights-of-way if the requirement is not 7specific to commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 8solar energy facilities and does not preclude the development 9of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial solar 10energy facilities or the ability of commercial wind energy 11facilities or commercial solar energy facilities to comply 12with the requirements set forth in this subsection (e). 13    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 14waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 15affected nonparticipating property.16    (e-5) Commercial solar energy facilities or commercial 17wind energy facilities shall be placed in zoning districts 18primarily intended for agricultural or manufacturing uses. 19    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 20in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 21commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 22than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 23Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 24901, and 910. Additionally, in accordance with Section 25 of 25the Environmental Protection Act, a participating property, 26participating residence, nonparticipating property,   HB5477- 28 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1nonparticipating residence, or any combination of those 2properties or residences may waive enforcement of the rules 3adopted by the Illinois Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. 4Adm. Code Parts 900, 901, and 910 by written waiver that 5complies with the applicable directive established in Section 625 of the Environmental Protection Act and is recorded in the 7Office of the Recorder of the county in which the 8participating property, participating residence, 9nonparticipating property, or nonparticipating residence is 10located. Once recorded, such a waiver shall be binding on any 11current and future owners, residents, lessees, invitees, and 12users of the participating property, participating residence, 13nonparticipating property, or nonparticipating residence for 14enforcement purposes. An owner of any participating residence 15or nonparticipating residence shall disclose the existence of 16such a waiver to any lessee before entering any new lease for 17the residence. 18    A seller or transferor of a participating property, 19participating residence, nonparticipating property, 20nonparticipating residence, or any combination of those 21properties or residences shall disclose the existence of such 22a waiver to any buyer or transferee before any sale or transfer 23of the property. If disclosure of the waiver occurs after the 24buyer has made an offer to purchase the property, the seller 25shall disclose the existence of the waiver before accepting 26the buyer's offer and shall (1) allow the buyer an opportunity   HB5477- 29 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1to review the disclosure and (2) inform the buyer that the 2buyer has the right to amend the buyer's offer. 3    (f-5) A county may designate commercial wind energy 4facilities and commercial solar energy facilities as permitted 5uses for certain zoning districts. 6    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 7installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 8commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 9that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 10siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 11development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 12solar energy facilities , unless the development is determined 13by the county, based on evidence presented at a public 14hearing, to be detrimental to the public health, safety, or 15welfare of county residents, or the development site or 16adjacent property is consistent with the legal standard set 17forth in La Salle National Bank of Chicago v. Cook County, 12 18Ill.2d 40 (1957). 19    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 20commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 21facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 22permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 23the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 24ordinance adopted consistent with this Act, and the conditions 25imposed under State and federal statutes and regulations and 26if the approval would not be invalid considering the following   HB5477- 30 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1factors: . 2        (1) the uniformity with the existing uses and zoning 3    of nearby property;4        (2) the extent to which property values are diminished 5    by the particular zoning restrictions;6        (3) the extent to which the destruction of property 7    values promotes the health, safety, morals, or general 8    welfare of the public;9        (4) the relative gain to the public as compared to the 10    hardship imposed on the individual property owner;11        (5) the suitability of the property for the zoned 12    purpose;13        (6) the length of time the property has been vacant as 14    zoned considered in the context of land development in the 15    area;16        (7) the care with which a community has planned its 17    land use development; and18        (8) the community need for the proposed use. 19    (g-5) A county may not approve a request for siting 20approval or a special use permit for a commercial wind energy 21facility or a commercial solar energy facility or the 22modification of an approved siting or special use permit if 23the proposal disturbs more than one acre of land, unless the 24facility owner has obtained a National Pollution Discharge 25Elimination System permit from the Illinois Environmental 26Protection Agency.   HB5477- 31 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 2disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 3facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 4developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 5agricultural or industrial uses. 6    (h-5) A county may deny a request for a special use permit 7for a commercial solar energy facility or commercial wind 8energy facility in areas planned as a residential development 9under either a county comprehensive plan or a municipal 10comprehensive plan. 11    (i) (Blank). 12    (i-5) All siting approval or special use permit 13application fees for a commercial wind energy facility or 14commercial solar energy facility must be reasonable. Fees that 15do not exceed $5,000 per each megawatt of nameplate capacity 16of the energy facility, up to a maximum of $125,000, shall be 17considered presumptively reasonable. A county may also require 18reimbursement from the applicant for any reasonable expenses 19incurred by the county in processing the siting approval or 20special use permit application in excess of the maximum fee. A 21siting approval or special use permit shall not be subject to 22any time deadline to start construction or obtain a building 23permit of less than 5 years from the date of siting approval or 24special use permit approval. A county shall allow an applicant 25to request an extension of the deadline based upon reasonable 26cause for the extension request. The exemption shall not be   HB5477- 32 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or denied.2    (i-10) A county may require, for a commercial wind energy 3facility or commercial solar energy facility, a single 4building permit and a reasonable permit fee for the facility 5which includes all supporting facilities. County building 6permit fees for commercial wind energy facility or commercial 7solar energy facility that do not exceed $5,000 per each 8megawatt of nameplate capacity of the energy facility, up to a 9maximum of $75,000, shall be considered presumptively 10reasonable. A county may also require reimbursement from the 11applicant for any reasonable expenses incurred by the county 12in processing the building permit in excess of the maximum 13fee. A county may require an applicant, upon start of 14construction of the facility, to maintain liability insurance 15that is commercially reasonable and consistent with prevailing 16industry standards for similar energy facilities.17    (j) A county may set standards for construction, repair, 18decommissioning, or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy 19facility or commercial solar energy facility within its 20boundaries. Any Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 21a county shall not require standards for construction, repair, 22decommissioning, or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy 23facility or commercial solar energy facility imposed by a 24county must satisfy the minimum standards set forth or related 25financial assurances that are more restrictive than those 26included in the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm   HB5477- 33 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 2standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 3version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 42022, or the most recent version of the mitigation agreements 5if any subsequent version has been adopted after December 31, 62022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 7accordance with the financial assurance required by this 8Section those agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 9    (j-5) Each A commercial wind energy facility or a 10commercial solar energy facility shall require file a farmland 11drainage plan that outlines with the county and impacted 12drainage districts outlining how surface and subsurface 13drainage of farmland will be restored during and following 14construction or deconstruction of the facility that is 15approved by the county and impacted drainage districts. The 16plan is to be created by an independent consultant, selected 17by the county, and paid for independently by the facility 18developer and shall include the location of any potentially 19impacted drainage district facilities to the extent this 20information is publicly available from the county or the 21drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface drainage 22affected during construction or deconstruction using 23procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 24agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 25owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 26procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage   HB5477- 34 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 2and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 3practicable. The county and impacted drainage districts shall 4complete review of the farmland drainage plan within 60 days 5after submission of the plan to the county. Upon completion of 6review, the county and impacted drainage districts shall issue 7a written determination to the facility developer on its 8decision to either approve the plan, or deny the plan stating, 9specifically, the reason for denial of the plan. 10    (j-10) In accordance with the Renewable Energy Facilities 11Agricultural Impact Mitigation Act, a facility owner shall 12provide the county where a commercial solar energy facility or 13commercial wind energy facility is to be located with a 14deconstruction plan that has been prepared by a professional 15engineer licensed under the Professional Engineering Practice 16Act of 1989, who has been selected by the facility owner. The 17deconstruction plan shall contain information that satisfies 18each of the components of deconstruction as set forth in this 19Section and in the construction and deconstruction standards 20and policies of the Department of Agriculture's standard wind 21farm agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, 22or standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 23version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 242022, or the most recent version of the mitigation agreements 25if any subsequent version has been adopted after December 31, 262022. The county shall have its own professional engineer   HB5477- 35 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1review the deconstruction plan and either approve or deny the 2deconstruction plan within 60 days after a complete submittal. 3If the deconstruction plan is denied, the county shall provide 4a written statement of the specific reasons for denial. The 5facility owner may file a revised deconstruction plan that 6addresses the specific reasons that led to the denial of the 7initial deconstruction plan. The county shall review and act 8on any revised deconstruction plan within 30 days after it is 9resubmitted. The facility owner shall reevaluate the estimated 10costs of deconstruction of any facility after the fifth 11anniversary of the commercial operation date and every 5 years 12thereafter. The facility owner shall file with the county, on 13or before the end of the fifth year of commercial operation, 14and every 5 years thereafter, for approval by the county, an 15updated deconstruction plan prepared by a professional 16engineer who has been selected by the county. Based on an 17initial evaluation or reevaluation during the county approval 18process, the county may require changes in the level of 19financial assurance required from the facility owner. If the 20county is unable to perform to its satisfaction, the necessary 21investigations to approve the deconstruction plan filed by the 22facility owner, then the county and facility may mutually 23agree on the selection of a professional engineer, independent 24of the facility owner, to conduct any necessary investigations 25to approve the deconstruction plan. The facility owner shall 26be responsible for the cost of the preparation of the   HB5477- 36 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1deconstruction plan by its professional engineer or any 2independent professional engineer and the cost of any plan 3reviews by the professional engineer selected by the county. A 4commercial solar energy facility owner or commercial wind 5energy facility owner shall provide the county with an 6appropriate financial assurance mechanism consistent with the 7financial requirements of this subsection, which shall be set 8forth in the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 9agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 10standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 11version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 122022, or the most recent version of the mitigation agreements 13if any subsequent version has been adopted after December 31, 142022. The financial assurance shall be sufficient to cover the 15estimated costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the 16facility if damage to the facility is caused by natural 17disaster or by operational malfunction and the estimated costs 18of repair or deconstruction of the facility in the event of 19abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility or 20abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility as defined 21in Section 10 of the Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 22Impact Mitigation Act. The facility owner shall provide the 23county with the initial financial assurance to cover 100% of 24the estimated deconstruction costs prior to the commercial 25operation date. A county may use the financial assurance 26provided by the facility owner to cover public safety or   HB5477- 37 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1emergency repairs that are not timely addressed by the 2facility owner, as determined by the county's designated 3representative. If a county must use a portion of the 4financial assurance to address any public safety or emergency 5repairs or to deconstruct a portion of the facility, the 6facility owner shall replenish the financial assurance for the 7amount used within 60 days after the expenditure of the 8financial assurance consistent with the Department's standard 9agricultural impact mitigation agreement. The purpose of the 10financial assurance shall be to assure deconstruction in the 11event of an abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility 12or commercial wind energy facility or to cover the estimated 13costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the facility in 14the event of damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 15or operational malfunction. 16    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 17wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 18property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 19to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 20    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 21between a commercial solar energy facility and 22nonparticipating residences. A county may not require earthen 23berms or similar structures, except that a county may require 24earthen berms for ground-based commercial solar energy 25projects and may adopt regulations governing the construction 26and maintenance of such earthen berms. Vegetative screening   HB5477- 38 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1requirements shall be commercially reasonable and limited in 2height at full maturity to avoid reduction of the productive 3energy output of the commercial solar energy facility. A 4county may not require vegetative screening to exceed 5 feet 5in height when first installed or prior to commercial 6operation date. The screening requirements shall take into 7account the size and location of the facility, visibility from 8nonparticipating residences, compatibility of native plant 9species, cost and feasibility of installation and maintenance, 10and industry standards and best practices for commercial solar 11energy facilities. 12    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 13towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 14blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 15height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 16Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 17Part 77.18    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 19facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 20provide:21        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 22    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 23    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 24    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and25        (2) (blank). 26    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility   HB5477- 39 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 2recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 3Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 4Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 5    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:6        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 7    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 8    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or9        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 10    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 11    protected lands, including areas identified by the 12    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.13    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 14evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 15Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 16State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 17Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 18    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 19limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 20at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 21health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 22songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 23commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 24and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 25cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 26Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation   HB5477- 40 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 2impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 3and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 4if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 5comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 6the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 7constructed. 8    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 9effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 10Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 11vegetation management plans that may be required under this 12subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 13guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 14property management practices that provide and maintain native 15and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 16the health and well-being of pollinators. 17    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 18with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 19district, or other unit of local government relating to a 20commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 21facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 22owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 23improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 24commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 25facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 26by the facility owner during construction of the commercial   HB5477- 41 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 2so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 3driving public after the completion of the facility's 4construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 5the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 6commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 7restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 8the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 9a result of construction-related activities.10    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 11owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 12specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 13the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 14energy facility. No road district or other unit of local 15government may request or require permit fees, fines, or other 16payment obligations as a requirement for a road use agreement 17with a facility owner unless the amount of the reasonable 18permit fee or payment is equivalent to the amount of actual 19expenses incurred by the road district or other unit of local 20government for negotiating, executing, constructing, or 21implementing the road use agreement. The road use agreement 22shall not require any road work to be performed by or paid for 23by the facility owner that is not specifically and uniquely 24attributable to the road improvements required for the 25construction of the commercial wind energy facility or the 26commercial solar energy facility or the restoration of the   HB5477- 42 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1roads used by the facility owner during construction-related 2activities. 3    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 4for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 5damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 6the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 7energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 8commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 9the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 10caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 11facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 12with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 13for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 14owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 15or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 16caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 17wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 18as soon as reasonably practicable. 19    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 20owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 21commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 22facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 23including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 24ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 25the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 26Code , if the facility owner has obtained prior approval of a   HB5477- 43 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1farmland drainage plan by a county, the impacted drainage 2districts, or both the county and the impacted drainage 3district without obtaining prior agreement or approval from 4the drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 5plan required by subsection (j-5). 6    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 7102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 8approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 9energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 10application was submitted to a unit of local government before 11January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 12(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 13energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 14agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 15Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 16Public Act 102-1123); (3) a commercial wind energy or 17commercial solar energy development on property that is 18located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 19Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 20appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 21and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 22Interstate 88 and Interstate 39; or (4) a commercial wind 23energy or commercial solar energy development on property in 24Madison County that is located within the area that has as its 25northern boundary the portion of Drexelius Road that is 26between the intersection of Drexelius Road and Wolf Road and   HB5477- 44 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1the intersection of Drexelius Road and Fosterburg Road, that 2has as its eastern boundary the portion of Fosterburg Road 3that is between the intersection of Fosterburg Road and 4Drexelius Road and the intersection of Fosterburg Road and 5Wolf Road, and that has as its southern and western boundaries 6the portion of Wolf Road that is between the intersection of 7Fosterburg Road and Wolf Road and the intersection of 8Drexelius Road and Wolf Road.9(Source: P.A. 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 10104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 11    Section 15. The Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 12Impact Mitigation Act is amended by changing Sections 10 and 1315 as follows: 14    (505 ILCS 147/10)15    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 16    "Abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility" means 17when deconstruction has not been completed within 18 months 18after the commercial wind energy facility reaches the end of 19its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial 20wind energy facility will be presumed to have reached the end 21of its useful life if (1) no electricity is generated for a 22continuous period of 12 months and (2) the commercial wind 23energy facility owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive 24months, to pay the landowner amounts owed in accordance with   HB5477- 45 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1the underlying agreement.2    "Abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility" means 3when deconstruction has not been completed within 12 months 4after the commercial solar energy facility reaches the end of 5its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial 6solar energy facility shall be presumed to have reached the 7end of its useful life if the commercial solar energy facility 8owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive months, to pay the 9landowner amounts owed in accordance with the underlying 10agreement. 11    "Agricultural impact mitigation agreement" means an 12agreement between the commercial wind energy facility owner or 13the commercial solar energy facility owner and the Department 14of Agriculture described in Section 15 of this Act. 15    "Commercial renewable energy facility" means a commercial 16wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility as 17defined in this Act. 18    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a solar energy 19conversion facility equal to or greater than 500 kilowatts in 20total nameplate capacity, including a solar energy conversion 21facility seeking an extension of a permit to construct granted 22by a county or municipality before the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. "Commercial 24solar energy facility" does not include a solar energy 25conversion facility: (1) for which a permit to construct has 26been issued before the effective date of this amendatory Act   HB5477- 46 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1of the 100th General Assembly; (2) that is located on land 2owned by the commercial solar energy facility owner; (3) that 3was constructed before the effective date of this amendatory 4Act of the 100th General Assembly; or (4) that is located on 5the customer side of the customer's electric meter and is 6primarily used to offset that customer's electricity load and 7is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or equal to 2,000 8kilowatts. 9    "Commercial solar energy facility owner" means a private 10commercial enterprise that owns a commercial solar energy 11facility. A commercial solar energy facility owner is not nor 12shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in the 13Public Utilities Act.14    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 15conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 16total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 17facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 18an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 19municipality before the effective date of this Act. 20"Commercial wind energy facility" does not include a wind 21energy conversion facility: (1) that has submitted a complete 22permit application to a county or municipality and for which 23the hearing on the completed application has commenced on the 24date provided in the public hearing notice, which must be 25before the effective date of this Act; (2) for which a permit 26to construct has been issued before the effective date of this   HB5477- 47 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1Act; or (3) that was constructed before the effective date of 2this Act.3    "Commercial wind energy facility owner" means a private 4commercial enterprise that owns or operates a commercial wind 5energy facility. A commercial wind energy facility owner is 6not nor shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in 7the Public Utilities Act. 8    "Construction" means the installation, preparation for 9installation, or repair of a commercial renewable energy 10facility. 11    "County" means the county where the commercial renewable 12energy facility is located. 13    "Deconstruction" means the removal of a commercial 14renewable energy facility from the property of a landowner and 15the restoration of that property as provided in the 16agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 17    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. 18    "Financial assurance" means a reclamation or surety bond, 19including both performance bond obligations, and payment bond 20obligations, or an irrevocable letter of credit, or other 21commercially available financial assurance that is acceptable 22to the county, with the county or landowner as beneficiary. 23    "Landowner" means any person (1) with an ownership 24interest in property that is used for agricultural purposes 25and (2) that is a party to an underlying agreement. 26    "Underlying agreement" means the written agreement with a   HB5477- 48 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1landowner, including, but not limited to, an easement, option, 2lease, or license, under the terms of which another person has 3constructed, constructs, or intends to construct a commercial 4wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on 5the property of the landowner.6(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.) 7    (505 ILCS 147/15)8    Sec. 15. Agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 9    (a) A commercial renewable energy facility owner of a 10commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 11facility that is located on landowner property shall enter 12into an agricultural impact mitigation agreement with the 13Department outlining construction and deconstruction standards 14and policies designed to preserve the integrity of any 15agricultural land that is impacted by commercial renewable 16energy facility construction and deconstruction. The 17construction and deconstruction of any commercial solar energy 18facility shall be in conformance with the Department's 19standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement referenced 20in subsection (f) of this Section and any additional standards 21set forth by the county in which the facility is to be located 22in accordance with subsections (j) through (j-10) of Section 235-12020 of the Counties Code. Except as provided in subsection 24(a-5) of this Section, the terms and conditions of the 25Department's standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement   HB5477- 49 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1are subject to and may be modified by an underlying agreement 2between the landowner and the commercial solar energy facility 3owner. 4    (a-5) Prior to the commencement of construction, a 5commercial renewable energy facility owner of a commercial 6wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy facility 7owner shall submit to the county in which the commercial solar 8energy facility is to be located, a deconstruction plan that 9has been prepared by a professional engineer licensed under 10the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, who has 11been selected by the facility owner. The deconstruction plan 12shall contain information that satisfies each of the 13components of deconstruction as set forth in this Section, and 14in the construction and deconstruction standards and policies 15of the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 16agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 17standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 18version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 192022, or the most recent version of the mitigation agreements 20if any subsequent version has been adopted after December 31, 212022. The county shall have its own professional engineer 22review the deconstruction plan and either approve or deny the 23deconstruction plan within 60 days after a complete submittal. 24If the deconstruction plan is denied, the county shall provide 25a written statement of the specific reasons for denial. The 26facility owner may file a revised deconstruction plan that   HB5477- 50 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1addresses the specific reasons that led to the denial of the 2initial deconstruction plan. The county shall review and act 3on any revised deconstruction plan within 30 days after it is 4resubmitted. The facility owner shall reevaluate the estimated 5costs of deconstruction of any facility after the fifth 6anniversary, and every 5 years thereafter, of the commercial 7operation date. The facility owner shall file with the county 8on or before the end of the fifth year of commercial operation, 9and then every fifth year thereafter, for approval by the 10county, an updated deconstruction plan prepared by a 11professional engineer who has been selected by the county. 12Based on any initial evaluation or reevaluation during the 13county approval process, the county may require changes in the 14level of financial assurance required from the facility owner. 15If the county is unable to perform, to its satisfaction, the 16necessary investigations to approve the deconstruction plan 17filed by the facility owner, then the county and facility may 18mutually agree on the selection of a professional engineer, 19independent of the facility owner, to conduct any necessary 20investigations to approve the deconstruction plan. The 21facility owner shall be responsible for the cost of the 22preparation of the deconstruction plan by its professional 23engineer, or any independent professional engineer, and the 24cost of any plan reviews by the professional engineer selected 25by the county. A commercial solar energy facility owner shall 26provide the county with an appropriate financial assurance   HB5477- 51 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1mechanism consistent with the financial requirements set forth 2in this subsection, which shall be set forth in the Department 3of Agriculture's Department's standard wind farm agricultural 4impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or standard solar 5agricultural impact mitigation agreement, version 8.19.19, as 6applicable and in effect on December 31, 2022, or the most 7recent version of the mitigation agreements if any subsequent 8version have been adopted after December 31, 2022. The 9financial assurance shall be sufficient to cover the estimated 10costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the facility in 11the event of damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 12or by operational malfunction, and the estimated costs of 13repairs or deconstruction of the facility in the event of 14abandonment of the facility. The facility owner shall provide 15the county with the initial financial assurance to cover 100% 16of the estimated deconstruction costs prior to the commercial 17operation date. A county may use the financial assurance 18provided by the facility owner to cover public safety or 19emergency repairs that are not timely addressed by the 20facility owner, as determined by the county's designated 21representative. If a county must use a portion of the 22financial assurance to address any public safety or emergency 23repairs or to deconstruct a portion of the facility, the 24facility owner shall replenish the financial assurance for the 25amount used within 60 days after the expenditure of the 26financial assurance. The purpose of the financial assurance   HB5477- 52 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1shall be for and to assure deconstruction in the event of an 2abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility or 3commercial wind energy facility, or to cover the estimated 4costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the facility in 5the event of damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 6or by operational malfunction. 7    (b) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 8commercial wind energy facility shall include, but is not 9limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 10affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 11abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility), estimated 12costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the facility in 13the event of damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 14or by operational malfunction, construction staging, and 15storage areas; support structures; aboveground facilities; guy 16wires and anchors; underground cabling depth; topsoil 17replacement; protection and repair of agricultural drainage 18tiles; rock removal; repair of compaction and rutting; land 19leveling; prevention of soil erosion; repair of damaged soil 20conservation practices; compensation for damages to private 21property; clearing of trees and brush; interference with 22irrigation systems; access roads; weed control; pumping of 23water from open excavations; advance notice of access to 24private property; indemnification of landowners; and 25deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 26deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial   HB5477- 53 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1wind energy facility); and estimated costs of public safety or 2emergency repairs to the facility in the event of damage to the 3facility caused by natural disaster or by operational 4malfunction. 5    (b-5) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 6commercial solar energy facility shall include, but is not 7limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 8affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 9abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility); the 10estimated costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the 11facility in the event of damage to the facility caused by 12natural disaster or by operational malfunction; support 13structures; aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; 14underground cabling depth; topsoil removal and replacement; 15rerouting and permanent repair of agricultural drainage tiles; 16rock removal; repair of compaction and rutting; construction 17during wet weather; land leveling; prevention of soil erosion; 18repair of damaged soil conservation practices; compensation 19for damages to private property; clearing of trees and brush; 20access roads; weed control; advance notice of access to 21private property; indemnification of landowners; and 22deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 23deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 24solar energy facility); and the estimated costs of public 25safety or emergency repairs to the facility in the event of 26damage to the facility caused by natural disaster or by   HB5477- 54 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1operational malfunction. The commercial solar energy facility 2owner shall enter into one agricultural impact mitigation 3agreement for each commercial solar energy facility. 4    (c) For commercial wind energy facility owners seeking a 5permit from a county or municipality for the construction of a 6commercial wind energy facility, the agricultural impact 7mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to the public 8hearing required prior to a siting decision of a county or 9municipality regarding the commercial wind energy facility. 10The agricultural impact mitigation agreement is binding on any 11subsequent commercial wind energy facility owner that takes 12ownership of the commercial wind energy facility that is the 13subject of the agreement. 14    (c-5) A commercial solar energy facility owner shall, not 15less than 45 days prior to commencement of actual 16construction, submit to the Department a standard agricultural 17impact mitigation agreement as referenced in subsection (f) of 18this Section signed by the commercial solar energy facility 19owner and including all information required by the 20Department. The commercial solar energy facility owner shall 21provide either a copy of that submitted agreement or a copy of 22the fully executed project-specific agricultural impact 23mitigation agreement to the landowner not less than 30 days 24prior to the commencement of construction. The agricultural 25impact mitigation agreement is binding on any subsequent 26commercial solar energy facility owner that takes ownership of   HB5477- 55 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1the commercial solar energy facility that is the subject of 2the agreement. 3    (d) If a commercial renewable energy facility owner seeks 4an extension of a permit granted by a county or municipality 5for the construction of a commercial wind energy facility 6prior to the effective date of this Act, the agricultural 7impact mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to a 8decision by the county or municipality to grant the permit 9extension. 10    (e) The Department may adopt rules that are necessary and 11appropriate for the implementation and administration of 12agricultural impact mitigation agreements as required under 13this Act. 14    (f) The Department shall make available on its website a 15standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement applicable 16to all commercial solar energy facilities within 60 days after 17the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 18Assembly. The standard agricultural impact mitigation 19agreements shall be amended as needed to conform with the 20financial assurance procedures and requirements under 21subsection (j) through (j-10) of Section 5-12020 of the 22Counties Code. 23    (g) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 100th General 24Assembly and nothing in an agricultural impact mitigation 25agreement shall be construed to apply to or otherwise impair 26an underlying agreement for a commercial solar energy facility   HB5477- 56 -LRB104 20584 TRT 34074 b1entered into prior to the effective date of this amendatory 2Act of the 100th General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.) 4    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 5changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 6that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 7represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 8not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 9made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 10Public Act.